test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-odd_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Oddsyllable nouns belonging to MALIS, SEAMU, GAHPIR, BOAHTIN, LEXDIMINC

Tests:
  Noun - eappir: # MALIS
    eappir+N+Sg+Nom: eappir
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen: eabbára
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen: eabbár
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: eabbáreame
    eappir+N+Sg+Ill: eabbárii
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: eabbáriinnán
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: eabbáriinnám
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1: [eabbáriinnin, eabbáriinnen]
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [eabbáriinnim, eabbáriinnem]
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1: eabbáriinnen
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: eabbáriinnem
    eappir+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: eabbáriiddámeguin
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: eabbáraččain
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: eabbáraččain
    eappir+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: eappirlažžan
    eappir+N+Der/lasj+Err/Orth+A+Ess: eappirlážžan
    
  Noun - guora: # SEAMU
    guora+N+Sg+Nom: guora
    guora+N+Sg+Gen: guorraga
    guora+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen: guorrat
    guora+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorrageame
    guora+N+Sg+Ill: guorragii
    guora+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorragiinnán
    guora+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: guorragiinnám
    guora+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1: [guorragiinnin, guorragiinnen]
    guora+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [guorragiinnim, guorragiinnem]
    guora+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1: guorragiinnen
    guora+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: guorragiinnem
    guora+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorragiiddámeguin
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: guorragaččain
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: guorragaččain

  Noun - guorbban: # GAHPIR
    guorbban+N+Sg+Nom: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen: guorbbana
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorbbaneame
    guorbban+N+Sg+Ill: guorbbanii
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorbbaniinnán
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: guorbbaniinnám
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1: [guorbbaniinnin, guorbbaniinnen]
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [guorbbaniinnim, guorbbaniinnem]
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1: guorbbaniinnen
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: guorbbaniinnem
    guorbban+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorbbaniiddámeguin
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: guorbbanaččain
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: guorbbanaččain
    guorbban+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: guorbbanlažžan
    guorbban+N+Der/lasj+Err/Orth+A+Ess: guorbbanlážžan
    
  Noun - fierdin: # BOAHTIN
    fierdin+N+Sg+Nom: fierdin
    fierdin+N+Sg+Gen: [fierdin, fierdima]
    fierdin+N+Sg+Ill: fierdimii

  Noun - linnjaságastallan: # BOAHTALADDAN
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Nom: linnjaságastallan
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Gen: linnjaságastallama
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen: linnjaságastallan
    linnjaságastallan+N+Sg+Ill: linnjaságastallamii

  Noun - steriilaguovddáš: # LEXDIMINC
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR: steriilaguovddáš-
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Nom: steriilaguovddáš
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Gen: steriilaguovddáža
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen: steriilaguovddáš
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: steriilaguovddážeame
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Ill: steriilaguovddážii
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: steriilaguovddážiinnán
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: steriilaguovddážiinnám
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1: [steriilaguovddážiinnin, steriilaguovddážiinnen]
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: [steriilaguovddážiinnim, steriilaguovddážiinnem]
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1: steriilaguovddážiinnen
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+PxSg1+Err/Orth: steriilaguovddážiinnem
    steriilaguovddáš+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: steriilaguovddážiiddámeguin
